Utah statutes.
63J-4a-601.   Provision of contract services to Office of Inspector General of Medicaid Services.

(1)  The division and the assistant attorneys general assigned to the division shall provide, without charge, contract review, contract enforcement, and other contract management services to the office.

(2)  The division shall ensure that the services described in Subsection (1) are provided in an expeditious manner.

(3)  The attorney general shall designate one of the assistant attorneys general assigned to the division to give first priority to providing the services described in Subsection (1) to the office.

(4)  The office and the division shall enter into a memorandum of understanding in order to execute the requirements of this section in an effective and efficient manner.



Enacted by Chapter 151, 2011 General Session

